Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1,134
Administrative procedure provisions; not applicable.

The provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act shall not apply to the Board of Pardons or to the exercise of its functions.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 65, p. 3104.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.